test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_eehid_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - eehid: # ok
    eehid+N+Sg+Nom: eehid
    eehid+N+Sg+Gen: eehid
    eehid+N+Sg+Acc: eehid
    eehid+N+Sg+Ill: ehidân
    eehid+N+Sg+Loc: ehidist
    eehid+N+Sg+Com: ehidáin
    eehid+N+Sg+Abe: eehidttáá
    eehid+N+Ess: ehidin
    eehid+N+Par: ehidid
    eehid+N+Pl+Nom: ehideh
    eehid+N+Pl+Gen: ehidij
    eehid+N+Pl+Acc: ehidijd
    eehid+N+Pl+Ill: ehidáid
    eehid+N+Pl+Loc: ehidijn
    eehid+N+Pl+Com: ehidijguin
    eehid+N+Pl+Abe: ehidijttáá
    
  Noun - juuhâm: # ok
    juuhâm+N+Sg+Nom: juuhâm
    juuhâm+N+Sg+Gen: juuhâm
    juuhâm+N+Sg+Acc: juuhâm
    juuhâm+N+Sg+Ill: juhâmân
    juuhâm+N+Sg+Loc: juhâmist
    juuhâm+N+Sg+Com: juhâmáin
    juuhâm+N+Sg+Abe: juuhâmttáá
    juuhâm+N+Ess: juhâmin
    juuhâm+N+Par: juhâmid
    juuhâm+N+Pl+Nom: juhâmeh
    juuhâm+N+Pl+Gen: juhâmij
    juuhâm+N+Pl+Acc: juhâmijd
    juuhâm+N+Pl+Ill: juhâmáid
    juuhâm+N+Pl+Loc: juhâmijn
    juuhâm+N+Pl+Com: juhâmijguin
    juuhâm+N+Pl+Abe: juhâmijttáá
 
  Noun - šoohâd: # ok
    šoohâd+N+Sg+Nom: šoohâd
    šoohâd+N+Sg+Gen: šoohâd
    šoohâd+N+Sg+Acc: šoohâd
    šoohâd+N+Sg+Ill: šohâdân
    šoohâd+N+Sg+Loc: šohâdist
    šoohâd+N+Sg+Com: šohâdáin
    šoohâd+N+Sg+Abe: šoohâdttáá
    šoohâd+N+Ess: šohâdin
    šoohâd+N+Par: šohâdid
    šoohâd+N+Pl+Nom: šohâdeh
    šoohâd+N+Pl+Gen: šohâdij
    šoohâd+N+Pl+Acc: šohâdijd
    šoohâd+N+Pl+Ill: šohâdáid
    šoohâd+N+Pl+Loc: šohâdijn
    šoohâd+N+Pl+Com: šohâdijguin
    šoohâd+N+Pl+Abe: šohâdijttáá

   Noun - šoohâd: # ok
    šoohâd+N+Sg+Nom: šoohâd
    šoohâd+N+Sg+Gen: šoohâd
    šoohâd+N+Sg+Acc: šoohâd
    šoohâd+N+Sg+Ill: šohâdân
    šoohâd+N+Sg+Loc: šohâdist
    šoohâd+N+Sg+Com: šohâdáin
    šoohâd+N+Sg+Abe: šoohâdttáá
    šoohâd+N+Ess: šohâdin
    šoohâd+N+Par: šohâdid
    šoohâd+N+Pl+Nom: šohâdeh
    šoohâd+N+Pl+Gen: šohâdij
    šoohâd+N+Pl+Acc: šohâdijd
    šoohâd+N+Pl+Ill: šohâdáid
    šoohâd+N+Pl+Loc: šohâdijn
    šoohâd+N+Pl+Com: šohâdijguin
    šoohâd+N+Pl+Abe: šohâdijttáá
 
  Noun - maađij: # ok
    maađij+N+Sg+Nom: maađij
    maađij+N+Sg+Gen: maađij
    maađij+N+Sg+Acc: maađij
    maađij+N+Sg+Ill: mađijân
    maađij+N+Sg+Loc: mađijist
    maađij+N+Sg+Com: mađijáin
    maađij+N+Sg+Abe: maađijttáá
    maađij+N+Ess: mađijin
    maađij+N+Par: mađijid
    maađij+N+Pl+Nom: mađijeh
    maađij+N+Pl+Gen: mađijij
    maađij+N+Pl+Acc: mađijijd
    maađij+N+Pl+Ill: mađijáid
    maađij+N+Pl+Loc: mađijijn
    maađij+N+Pl+Com: mađijijguin
    maađij+N+Pl+Abe: mađijijttáá

  Noun - suohâd: # ok
    suohâd+N+Sg+Nom: suohâd
    suohâd+N+Sg+Gen: suohâd
    suohâd+N+Sg+Acc: suohâd
    suohâd+N+Sg+Ill: suoˊhâdân
    suohâd+N+Sg+Loc: suoˊhâdist
    suohâd+N+Sg+Com: suoˊhâdáin
    suohâd+N+Sg+Abe: suohâdttáá
    suohâd+N+Ess: suoˊhâdin
    suohâd+N+Par: suoˊhâdid
    suohâd+N+Pl+Nom: suoˊhâdeh
    suohâd+N+Pl+Gen: suoˊhâdij
    suohâd+N+Pl+Acc: suoˊhâdijd
    suohâd+N+Pl+Ill: suoˊhâdáid
    suohâd+N+Pl+Loc: suoˊhâdijn
    suohâd+N+Pl+Com: suoˊhâdijguin
    suohâd+N+Pl+Abe: suoˊhâdijttáá
